Hawaii statutes.
[§662D-1] Definitions. As used
in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

"Governmental entity" means any
agency, association, authority, board, commission, division, office, officer,
public body, task force, or any other similar entity authorized or established
by any county or the State.

"Nonprofit corporation" means any
corporation that is exempt from taxation pursuant to section 501(a) of the
Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. section 501(a).

"Nonprofit organization" means any
organization that is exempt from taxation pursuant to section 501(c) of the
Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. section 501(c), as amended.

"Volunteer" means a person performing
services without compensation, other than reimbursement for actual expenses
incurred, for a nonprofit organization, a nonprofit corporation, a hospital, or
a governmental entity. The term includes a volunteer serving as a director,
officer, trustee, member, or direct service volunteer. [L 1997, c 351, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next